Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299A.707, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 25-05170 299A.707 COMMUNITY JUSTICE REINVESTMENT ACCOUNT. Subdivision 1. Account established. The community justice reinvestment account is established in the special revenue fund. Subd. 2. Account purpose, grants. Money in this account shall be allocated by a grant program administered by the commissioner of public safety through the Office of Justice Programs. Local units of government and nonprofit organizations are eligible for grants to establish or operate substance use disorder and mental health treatment programs, programs that improve supervision, including pretrial and precharge supervision, and programs to reduce recidivism of controlled substances offenders on probation or supervised release or participating in treatment courts or to fund local participation in treatment court initiatives approved by the Judicial Council. Subd. 3. Reporting. By January 15, in each even-numbered year, the commissioner shall report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and house of representatives committees and divisions having jurisdiction over criminal justice funding on grants made in the preceding two years from the account. Subd. 4. Legislative intent. It is the legislature's intent that savings to the state realized as a result of the passage of Laws 2016, chapter 160, be used to fund the transfers from the general fund to this account. Subd. 5. Appropriation. The amounts transferred to the account are appropriated to the commissioner to make grants under subdivision 2. Subd. 6. Annual transfer. In fiscal year 2018 and each year thereafter, the commissioner of management and budget shall transfer $461,000 from the general fund to the community justice reinvestment account.